Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.072

University of Washington fund—Appropriations to be paid from general fund.

From and after the first day of April, 1955, all appropriations made by the thirty-fourth legislature from the University of Washington fund shall be paid out of moneys in the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.072. Prior: 1955 c 332 s 2.]